src/noun-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON kudo-N-Derivation
+Ela+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>шка kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>шка kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Tra+Sg+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>кс osh-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Tra+Pl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>кс osh-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>шканзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>шканзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нзО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>шканО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>шканО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нО1к lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>шканк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>шканк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нк lak-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2аст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2аст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>шкаст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>шкаст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>ст kit-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Ela+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>стэ kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Ine+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>сэ kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Prl+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Comp+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>шка kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Abe+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>втеме kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Pl+Def+Tra+Der/MWN+N:%>тне%>кс osh-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>ньсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>ньсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2асе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2асе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкасе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкасе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Tra+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>кссе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Tra+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>кссе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Tra+Sg+Indef+LV+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>кс%>О1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Tra+Pl+Indef+LV+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>кс%>О1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2ансе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2ансе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкансе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкансе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2амсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2амсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкамсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкамсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>мсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2атсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2атсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкатсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкатсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>тЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2антсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2антсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкантсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкантсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нтЬ2се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шканзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шканзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нзО1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шканО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шканО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нО1ксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2анксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шканксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шканксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px2Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>нксе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ela+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>стО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Ine+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>сО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2астсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Prl+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2астсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкастсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Comp+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>шкастсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Sg+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Abe+Pl+Px3Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>втО1мО1%>стсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Gen+Sg+Def+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>нтьсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
